Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2074.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1302(a)(1) and (b) of Title 25 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 1302. Residence of electors.(a) General rule.--(1) For the purpose of registration and voting, no individual shall be deemed to have gained a residence by reason of presence or lost a residence by reason of absence in any of the following circumstances:(i) Being employed in the service, either civil or military, of this Commonwealth or of the United States.(ii) Being engaged in the navigation of the waters of this Commonwealth or of the United States or on the high seas.12345678910111213141516171819 (iii) Being in an institution at public expense. This subparagraph does not apply to a veteran who resides in a home for disabled and indigent soldiers and sailors maintained by the Commonwealth. Such a veteran may elect to utilize that residence for registration and voting or elect to vote as an absentee elector by the use of an absentee ballot.(iv) Being born outside of the United States and meeting the definition of "overseas voter" under section 3502 (relating to definitions).* * *(b) Rules for determination.--The following apply:(1) That the place shall be considered the residence of an individual in which habitation is fixed and to which, whenever the individual is absent, the individual has the intention of returning.(2) An individual shall not be considered to have lost residence if the individual leaves home and goes into another state or another election district for temporary purposes only, with the intention of returning.(3) An individual shall not be considered to have gained a residence in an election district if the individual comes into that district for temporary purposes only, without the intention of making that election district a permanent place of abode.(4) If an individual removes to another state with the intention of making that state the permanent residence, the individual shall be considered to have lost residence in this Commonwealth.(5) If an individual removes to another state with the 20250HB2074PN2657 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 intention of remaining there an indefinite time and making that state the place of residence, the individual shall be considered to have lost residence in this Commonwealth, notwithstanding an intention to return at some indefinite future period.(6) If an individual goes into another state and, while there, votes in an election held by that state, the individual shall be considered to have lost residence in this Commonwealth.(7) An individual employed in the service of the Federal Government or of the Commonwealth and required thereby to be absent from the municipality where the individual resided when entering that employment and the spouse of the individual may remain registered in the district where the individual resided immediately prior to entering that employment, and the individual and the spouse shall be enrolled in the political party designated by the individual or spouse without declaring a residence by street and number.(i) An individual who registers under this paragraph for Commonwealth employment must produce a certificate from the head of the State agency, under the seal of office, setting forth that the individual or the individual's spouse is actually employed in the service of the Commonwealth and setting forth the nature of the employment and the time when the employee first entered the employment. The commission shall retain certificates under this subparagraph.(ii) The commission shall note on the registration record of each individual registered under this paragraph the fact of Federal or State employment.20250HB2074PN2657 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) At least once every two years the commission shall verify the employment of the individuals registered under this paragraph at the proper Federal or State office. If an individual is found to be no longer a Federal or State employee, the individual's registration shall be canceled under Chapter 15 (relating to changes in records).(8) If an individual was born outside of the United States and meets the definition of "overseas voter" under section 3502, the place where the individual's parent or guardian last domiciled immediately before leaving the United States shall be considered the election district of the individual.Section 2. The definition of "overseas voter" in section 3502 of Title 25 is amended to read:§ 3502. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Overseas voter." A qualified elector who is outside the United States. The term includes a citizen of the United States residing abroad who:(1) was born outside of the United States;(2) is not registered to vote in another state;(3) has not previously voted in another state;(4) except for the residency requirement under section 1301 (relating to qualifications to register), otherwise satisfies the voter eligibility requirements of this Commonwealth; and20250HB2074PN2657 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) has a parent or legal guardian who last domiciled in this Commonwealth immediately before leaving the United States.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2074PN2657 - 5 - 12345